Florida, session 2026, SB1072.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 16.571, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 16.571âAntisemitism Task Force.â 26 (1)âThe Antisemitism Task Force, a task force as defined in 27 s. 20.03(5), is created adjunct to the Office of Civil Rights 28 within the Department of Legal Affairs for the express purpose 29 of combating antisemitism in this state. Except as otherwise 30 provided in this section, the task force shall operate in a 31 manner consistent with s. 20.052. The department shall provide 32 administrative and staff support relating to the functions of 33 the task force. 34 (2)(a)âThe task force is composed of the following members: 35 1.âThree members appointed by the President of the Senate, 36 one of whom must be a representative of a Jewish community 37 organization in this state and one of whom must have expertise 38 in combating antisemitism. The President of the Senate shall 39 designate one of his or her appointees as co-chair of the task 40 force. 41 2.âThree members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 42 Representatives, one of whom must be a representative of a 43 Jewish community organization in this state and one of whom must 44 have expertise in combating antisemitism. The Speaker of the 45 House of Representatives shall designate one of his or her 46 appointees as co-chair of the task force. 47 3.âOne member of the Senate, appointed by the Minority 48 Leader of the Senate. 49 4.âOne member of the House of Representatives, appointed by 50 the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. 51 5.âTwo members appointed by the Governor, one of whom must 52 have legal expertise in civil rights law. 53 6.âThe Attorney General or his or her designee. 54 7.âThe Commissioner of Education or his or her designee. 55 8.âThe chair of the Florida Commission on Human Relations 56 or his or her designee. 57 9.âOne member appointed by the Florida Association of 58 Counties. 59 10.âOne member appointed by the Florida League of Cities. 60 11.âOne member appointed by the Florida Prosecuting 61 Attorneys Association. 62 12.âOne member appointed by the Florida Police Chiefs 63 Association. 64 13.âOne member appointed by the Florida Association of 65 District School Superintendents. 66 (b)âMembers of the task force shall serve 2-year terms. A 67 vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term 68 in the same manner as the original appointment. 69 (c)âMembers of the task force shall serve without 70 compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for per diem and 71 travel expenses in accordance with s. 112.061. 72 (3)âThe task force shall hold its first meeting by August 73 1, 2026. The task force shall convene at least once quarterly 74 but, at the call of the co-chairs, may meet more often as 75 necessary to complete the duties prescribed in this section. 76 (4)âThe task force shall: 77 (a)âIdentify and acknowledge the growing threat of 78 antisemitism in this state by conducting a comprehensive review 79 of the prevalence of antisemitism within this state. 80 (b)âStrengthen community relations by identifying and 81 creating opportunities for new connections between state and 82 local governments and local Jewish communities. 83 (c)âEngage with local Jewish communities and provide public 84 officials across this state with recommendations and support for 85 combating antisemitism. 86 (d)âAdvise on training programs for law enforcement 87 relating to the investigation and prosecution of hate crimes. 88 (e)âAssess existing state programs relating to education in 89 digital media literacy, including identifying educational gaps, 90 studying education efficacy, and planning for enhanced 91 educational offerings. 92 (f)âIdentify best practices from efforts to combat 93 antisemitism in other states and jurisdictions. 94 (g)âEvaluate this stateâs hate crime statutes and consider 95 whether amendments thereto would better protect residents from 96 antisemitism. 97 (h)âRecommend strategies, programs, and legislation to 98 combat antisemitism in this state. The initial report provided 99 pursuant to paragraph (i) shall examine antisemitism in schools 100 and universities. 101 (i)âBefore January 31 of each year, submit a report and 102 policy recommendations to the Governor, the President of the 103 Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 104 Minority Leader of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the House 105 of Representatives, the chair of the Judiciary Committee of the 106 Senate, and the chair of the Security and Threat Assessment 107 Committee of the House of Representatives. 108 (5)âFor the purposes of the task force, the term 109 âantisemitismâ does not include criticism of Israel which is 110 similar to criticism of any other country. 111 (6)âThis section may not be construed to diminish or 112 infringe upon any right protected under the First Amendment to 113 the United States Constitution or to conflict with federal or 114 state antidiscrimination laws. 115 (7)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is 116 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 117 through reenactment by the Legislature. 118 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.